Utah, session 2026, HB322.
Section 1. Section 72-4-224 is enacted to read:72-4-224. Gail S. Halvorsen Memorial Highway.(1)There is established the Gail S. Halvorsen Memorial Highway composed of the portion of SR-198 from the SR-164 in Spanish Fork southward to the common municipal boundary between the cities of Spanish Fork and Salem.(2)In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portion of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the Gail S. Halvorsen Memorial Highway on future state highway maps.(3)As soon as practicable, the Department of Transportation shall install appropriate signs along portions of the highway indicating the designation as the Gail S. Halvorsen Memorial Highway as described in Subsection (1).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.